Hawaii statutes.
§49-11 Use of revenue and user taxes of
undertaking or loan program. Whenever any revenue bonds have been issued
under this chapter for an undertaking or a loan program, the revenue, or the
user taxes, or combination of both, from which the revenue bonds are payable
and by which they are secured of the undertaking or loan program shall be
deposited in a special fund and shall be appropriated, applied, or expended,
and the county shall have the right to appropriate, apply, or expend the same,
in the amount necessary therefor for the following purposes and in such order
of priority as the county shall provide in the resolution or resolutions
authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds:

(1) To pay when due all revenue bonds and interest
thereon issued for the undertaking or loan program, for the payment of which
the revenue, or user taxes, or combination of both, is or shall have been
pledged, charged, or otherwise encumbered, including reserves therefor;

(2) To pay or provide for the payment of the cost of
operation, maintenance, and repair of the undertaking, or to pay or provide for
the payment of administering, operating, and maintaining the loan program,
including reserves therefor;

(3) For such purposes, within the jurisdiction,
powers, duties, and functions of the county, including the creation and
maintenance of reserves, as shall have been covenanted in any resolution or
resolutions of the county providing for the issuance of revenue bonds;

(4) To reimburse the general fund of the county for
all bond requirements for general obligation bonds which are or shall have been
issued for the undertaking or loan program, or to refund any of the general
obligation bonds, except insofar as the obligation of reimbursement has been or
shall be canceled by the governing body, the bond requirements being the
interest on term and serial bonds, sinking fund for term bonds, and principal
of serial bonds maturing the following year;

(5) To provide for betterments and improvements to
the undertaking or expansion of the loan program, including reserves therefor;
or

(6) To provide such special reserve funds and other
special funds as are or may be created by the resolution or resolutions
authorizing the revenue bonds.

Unless and until adequate provision has been made
for the foregoing purposes, the county shall not have the right to transfer to
its general fund or apply to any other purposes any part of the revenue, or
user taxes, pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds, of the undertaking or
loan program. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next